DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER

DI-359

SUPPLY SYSTEM
DI3BJ-04
DTC C 1251 / 51 Hydraulic Brake Booster Pump Motor
Malfunction
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Eitherofthefollowing (1) or (2) isdetected:
(1) Afterturning the ignition switch ON, the current of more
C1251/51 than 30A flows to the motorfor morethan 1 sec. Hvdraulic brake boost ‘
(2) After turning the ignition switch ON, less than 7A ydraulichrakeboosterpump motor
change in current is detected more than 3 times in a low
when the motor is ON.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the pump motor, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits ABS

control.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM
WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-361
SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

PREPARATION:

@ Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.

CHECK:

eI Connectbattery positive @ leadtoBM 1 orBM2terminaland

battery negative © leadtoEM 1 or EM2terminal ofthe hydraulic
brake booster (pump motor) connector.

OK:

EM1 The operation sound of the pump motor should be
F02859 heard.

OK> Go to step 4.

U ===

@

2 [ Check continuity between GND terminal of hydraulic brake booster (pump mo-
tor) connector and body ground.

CHECK:
Check continuity betweeneachof EM 1 and EM2terminals of
hydraulic brake booster (pump motor) connector and body
ground.
OK:

Continuity

©

F02860

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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SUPPLY SYSTEM

3 | Check hydraulic brake booster resistance.

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:

Connectresistance betweenterminals MT+and MT -, BM1 and

MTT,BM2andMTT,EM 1 and MT+, EM2and MT+ ofthe hy-
draulic brake booster connector.
OK:

30-36Q

F04505

NG> Repair the hydraulic brake booster.

@

Replace hydraulic brake booster pump mo-
tor.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER DI-363
SUPPLY SYSTEM

4 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic brake boost-
er (pump motor) and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

5 | Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between pressure
switch and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

3

Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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